Connecticut, session 2026, HB05166.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 20-195n of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) No person shall practice clinical social work unless such person
has obtained a license pursuant to this section.
(b) An applicant for licensure as a master social worker shall: (1) [(A)]
Hold a master's degree from a social work program [(i)] (A) accredited
by the Council on Social Work Education, or [(ii)] (B) that is in candidate
status for accreditation by said council and offered by an institution of
higher education in the state during or after the spring semester of 2024,
and prior to the spring semester of 2028; [,] or [(B)] (2) if educated
outside the United States or its territories, have completed an
educational program deemed equivalent by the council. [; and (2) pass
the masters level examination of the Association of Social Work Boards
or any other examination prescribed by the commissioner.]
HB5166 / File No. 23 1

HB5166 File No. 23
(c) An applicant for licensure as a clinical social worker shall: (1) Hold
a doctorate or master's degree from a social work program accredited
by the Council on Social Work Education or, if educated outside the
United States or its territories, have completed an educational program
deemed equivalent by the council; (2) have three thousand hours post-
master's social work experience which shall include not less than one
hundred hours of work under professional supervision by a licensed
clinical or certified independent social worker, provided on and after
October 1, 2011, such hours completed in this state shall be as a licensed
master social worker; and (3) pass the clinical level examination of the
Association of Social Work Boards or any other examination prescribed
by the commissioner. On and after October 1, 1995, any person certified
as an independent social worker prior to October 1, 1995, shall be
deemed licensed as a clinical social worker pursuant to this section,
except a person certified as an independent social worker on and after
October 1, 1990, shall not be deemed licensed as a clinical social worker
pursuant to this chapter unless such person has satisfied the
requirements of subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section,
the commissioner may grant a license by endorsement to an applicant
who presents evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that the
applicant [(1)] is licensed or certified as a master social worker or clinical
social worker in good standing in another state or jurisdiction whose
requirements for practicing in such capacity are substantially similar to
or higher than those of this state. [, and (2) has successfully completed
the master level examination of the Association of Social Work Boards,
or its successor organization, or any other examination prescribed by
the commissioner.] No license shall be issued under this subsection to
any applicant against whom professional disciplinary action is pending
or who is the subject of an unresolved complaint.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this section,
the commissioner may grant a license by endorsement to an applicant
who presents evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that the
applicant (1) is licensed or certified as a clinical social worker in good
HB5166 / File No. 23 2

HB5166 File No. 23
standing in another state or jurisdiction whose requirements for
practicing in such capacity are substantially similar to or greater than
those of this state, and (2) has successfully completed the clinical level
examination of the Association of Social Work Boards, or its successor
organization, or any other examination prescribed by the commissioner.
No license shall be issued under this subsection to any applicant against
whom professional disciplinary action is pending or who is the subject
of an unresolved complaint.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an applicant who
is licensed or certified as a clinical social worker or its equivalent in
another state, territory or commonwealth of the United States may
substitute three years of licensed or certified work experience in the
practice of clinical social work in lieu of the requirements of subdivision
(2) of subsection (c) of this section, provided the commissioner finds that
such experience is equal to or greater than the requirements of this state.
(g) The commissioner shall notify each applicant who is approved to
take an examination required under subsection [(b),] (c) [, (d)] or (e) of
this section that such applicant may be eligible for testing
accommodations pursuant to the federal Americans with Disabilities
Act, 42 USC 12101 et seq., as amended from time to time, or other
accommodations, as determined by the Association of Social Work
Boards, or its successor organization, which may include the use of a
dictionary while taking such examination and additional time within
which to take such examination.
Sec. 2. Section 20-195o of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
(a) Application for licensure shall be on forms prescribed and
furnished by the commissioner. Each applicant shall furnish evidence
satisfactory to the commissioner that he or she has met the requirements
of section 20-195n, as amended by this act.
[(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 20-195n concerning
HB5166 / File No. 23 3

HB5166 File No. 23
examinations, on or before October 1, 2015, the commissioner may issue
a license without examination, to any master social worker applicant
who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that, on or
before October 1, 2013, he or she held a master's degree from a social
work program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education or,
if educated outside the United States or its territories, completed an
educational program deemed equivalent by the council.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 20-195n concerning
examinations, the commissioner shall waive the requirement to pass the
masters level examination of the Association of Social Work Boards or
any other examination prescribed by the commissioner, as described in
subsection (b) of section 20-195n until January 1, 2026, at which time
such requirement shall be reinstituted. Not later than July 1, 2025, the
commissioner shall notify institutions of higher education offering
social work programs about the reinstitution of the examination for all
persons graduating after January 1, 2026.]
[(c)] (b) Each person licensed pursuant to this chapter may apply for
renewal of such licensure in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (e) of section 19a-88. A fee of two hundred dollars shall
100 accompany each renewal application for a licensed clinical social worker
101 and a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars shall accompany each
102 renewal application for a licensed master social worker. Each such
103 applicant shall furnish evidence satisfactory to the commissioner of
104 having satisfied the continuing education requirements prescribed in
105 section 20-195u.
106 [(d)] (c) No fee shall be required for an application for licensure under
107 subsection (a) of this section.
108 [(e)] (d) (1) An individual who has been convicted of any criminal
109 offense may request, in writing, at any time, that the commissioner
110 determine whether such individual's criminal conviction disqualifies
111 the individual from obtaining a license issued or conferred by the
112 commissioner pursuant to this chapter based on (A) the nature of the
113 conviction and its relationship to the individual's ability to safely or
HB5166 / File No. 23 4

HB5166 File No. 23
114 competently perform the duties or responsibilities associated with such
115 license, (B) information pertaining to the degree of rehabilitation of the
116 individual, and (C) the time elapsed since the conviction or release of
117 the individual.
118 (2) An individual making such request shall include (A) details of the
119 individual's criminal conviction, and (B) any payment required by the
120 commissioner. The commissioner may charge a fee of not more than
121 fifteen dollars for each request made under this subsection. The
122 commissioner may waive such fee.
123 (3) Not later than thirty days after receiving a request under this
124 subsection, the commissioner shall inform the individual making such
125 request whether, based on the criminal record information provided,
126 such individual is disqualified from receiving or holding a license
127 issued or conferred pursuant to this chapter.
128 (4) The commissioner is not bound by a determination made under
129 this subsection, if, upon further investigation, the commissioner
130 determines that an individual's criminal conviction differs from the
131 information presented in the determination request.
132 Sec. 3. Section 20-195t of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
133 is repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 20-195n
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 20-195o
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 Repealer section
PH Joint Favorable
HB5166 / File No. 23 5

HB5166 File No. 23
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Public Health, Dept. GF - Revenue None Minimal
Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill eliminates the examination requirement for master social
worker licensure, resulting in an annual minimal General Fund revenue
gain in license renewal fees beginning in FY 28. The amount of the
revenue gain will depend on the number of additional individuals who
apply for their initial license at no cost and, in FY 28 and beyond,
annually renew their master social worker license for $125 due to this
change. There are currently 5,608 master social workers licensed by the
state.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to any change in the license renewal fee.
HB5166 / File No. 23 6

HB5166 File No. 23
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5166
AN ACT CONCERNING SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE.